Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20252-414
Nitrogen reduction incentive program; created; incentive payments; authorized.

(1) The nitrogen reduction incentive program is created and shall be administered by the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment. The department may collaborate with natural resources districts to administer the program.

(2) The purposes of the program are to:

(a) Provide incentive payments to farmers; and

(b) Encourage farmers to (i) reduce the use of commercial fertilizer and (ii) incorporate innovative technology into farming practices, including the proper use of biological nitrogen products.

(3) The program shall provide an annual per-acre incentive for any farmer who verifies through documentation that commercial fertilizer rates were reduced by the lesser of forty pounds per acre for nitrogen or fifteen percent by incorporating a qualifying product in the farmer's nutrient plans.

(4) A commercial fertilizer rate reduction from historic baseline use shall be completed to qualify for the program.

(5) The department shall review the required commercial fertilizer rate of reduction for the program on a biennial basis to determine if higher reduction targets are necessary.

(6) The department shall:

(a) Collaborate with natural resources districts to add any new technology to the program as it becomes available. Such technology shall replace nitrogen fertilizer use and maintain farm productivity;

(b) Identify geographically beneficial target areas while keeping the program open to all farmers in the state;

(c) Consult with farmers and commercial entities in the agriculture industry to determine a per-acre payment rate tied to the commercial fertilizer rate reduction but not less than ten dollars per acre; and

(d) Review the per-acre payment rate based on inflation or emerging technology in subsequent years.

(7)(a) The department shall not award an amount of incentive payments in total per year under the nitrogen reduction incentive program that is greater than the lesser of:

(i) Five million dollars; or

(ii) The amount appropriated for such purpose by the Legislature.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that any appropriation from the General Fund to carry out the Nitrogen Reduction Incentive Act be used only for operating expenses.

Laws 2024, LB1368, § 4;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 8.
December 31, 2029